Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-310
License, defined.

License shall mean any license to conduct a lottery by the sale of pickle cards as provided in section 9-326, any license for a utilization-of-funds member as provided in section 9-327, any sales agent's license as provided in section 9-329, any pickle card operator's license as provided in section 9-329.02, any distributor's license as provided in section 9-330, or any manufacturer's license as provided in section 9-332.

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 76;

Laws 1989, LB 767, § 30;

Laws 1994, LB 694, § 67.